Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201671-8511
Behavioral Health Education Center;
duties.

The
Behavioral Health Education Center created pursuant to section 71-830 shall
provide education and training for educators on children's behavioral health
in the areas of the state served by the Behavioral Health Screening and Referral
Pilot Program created pursuant to section 71-8512.

Laws 2013, LB556, § 3.